Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 2 Boating Safety
69-9-217. Boating under the influence.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to operate any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section on the public waters of the state while under the influence of any intoxicant, marijuana, narcotic drug, or drug producing stimulating effects on the central nervous system.

For the purpose of this section:

“Commercial vessel” means any vessel used or whose principal use is to carry passengers for hire for monetary or other consideration or any vessel used or whose principal use is to transport or to assist in the transportation of goods or services;

“Drugs producing stimulating effects on the central nervous system” includes the salts of barbituric acid, also known as malonyl urea, or any compound, derivatives, or mixtures thereof that may be used for producing hypnotic or somnifacient effects, and includes amphetamine, desoxyephedrine or compounds or mixtures thereof, including all derivatives of phenolethylamine or any of the salts thereof, except preparations intended for use in the nose and unfit for internal use; and

“Test” means any chemical test designed to determine the alcoholic or drug content of the blood.

The fact that any person who operates any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section on public waters of the state while under the influence of narcotic or barbital drugs is or has been entitled to use such drugs under the laws of this state is not a defense to the violation of this section.

Any person who operates any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section on the public waters of the state shall be determined to have consented to one (1) or more tests for the purpose of determining the alcoholic or drug content of the person's blood; provided, that any such test is administered at the direction of an officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person has been operating any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section while under the influence of an intoxicant or drug.

The specimen to be used for such test shall include blood, urine or breath.

Any physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, clinical laboratory technologist, clinical laboratory technician, licensed paramedic or, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, licensed emergency medical technician approved to establish intravenous catheters, technologist, or certified or nationally registered phlebotomist who, acting at the written request of an officer, withdraws blood from a person for the purpose of making such test, shall not incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of the withdrawing of such blood, except for any damages that may result from the negligence of the person so withdrawing. Neither the hospital nor other employer of such physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, clinical technician, technologist, or certified or nationally registered phlebotomist, shall incur, except for negligence, any civil or criminal liability as a result of the act of withdrawing blood from any person submitting to such test.

An officer who requests that the person operating any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section submit to a test pursuant to this section for the purpose of determining the alcoholic or drug content of such person's blood shall, prior to conducting such test, advise the person that refusal to submit to such test will result in the suspension by the court of such person's privilege to operate any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section.

The court having jurisdiction of the offenses for which such person was placed under arrest does not have the authority to suspend the privilege of a person who refuses to submit to the test if such person was not advised of the consequences of such a refusal.

If such person having been placed under arrest and thereafter has been requested by an officer to submit to the test and advised of the consequences for refusing to do so, refuses to submit, the test shall not be given and such person shall be charged with violating this section.

The determination as to whether a person violated this section shall be made at the same time and by the same court as the one disposing of the offense for which such person was placed under arrest. If the court finds that the person violated this section, the person shall not be considered as having committed a criminal offense; however, the court shall suspend the privilege of such driver for a period of six (6) months.

Any person, who is unconscious at the time of arrest or apprehension or otherwise in a condition rendering such person incapable of refusal, shall be subjected to the test, but the results of the test shall not be used as evidence against such person in any court without the consent of the person so tested.

It is the duty of the enforcement agency investigating boating accidents in which fatalities or serious injuries occur to obtain blood alcohol content from all operators involved and submit the results of the blood alcohol content to the district attorney general.

Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation of this section, the results of any test made of the person so charged are admissible in evidence in a criminal proceeding. Failure of an officer to request the administering of a test is likewise admissible in evidence in a criminal proceeding.

For the purpose of this section, evidence that there was, at the time alleged, five-hundredths of one percent (0.05%), or less, by weight of alcohol in the blood of the defendant, shall create no presumption.

Evidence that there was, at the time alleged, alcohol concentration in a person's blood or breath equal to or greater than the amount constituting the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant as provided in § 55-10-401(2) shall constitute a violation of this section.

The results of any test authorized by subsections (d)-(l ) shall be reported in writing by the person making such test and such report shall have noted on it the time at which the sample analyzed was obtained from the person. Upon request of the person tested, the results of such test shall be made available to such person.

The procurement of a sample of a person's blood for making a test as provided by this subsection (l ) and subsections (d)-(k), to be considered valid under this subsection (l ) and subsections (d)-(k), shall be performed by a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, clinical laboratory technologist, clinical laboratory technician, licensed paramedic or, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, licensed emergency medical technician approved to establish intravenous catheters, technologist, or certified or nationally registered phlebotomist, or at the direction of a medical examiner or other physician holding an unlimited license to practice medicine in Tennessee under procedures established by the department of health.

Upon receipt of a specimen forwarded to the director's office for analysis, the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall have it examined for alcohol concentration or for the presence of narcotic or other drugs, if requested by the arresting officer, county medical examiner, or any district attorney general. The chief medical examiner or the medical examiner's duly appointed representative shall execute a certificate that indicates the name of the accused, the date, time and by whom the specimen was received and examined, and a statement of the alcohol concentration or presence of drugs in the specimen.

When a specimen taken in accordance with this section is forwarded for testing to the office of the director, a report of the results of such test shall be made and filed in the director's office, and a copy mailed to the district attorney general for the district where the case arose.

The certificate provided for in subdivision (l )(2) is, when duly attested by the director or the director's duly appointed representative, admissible in any court, in any criminal proceeding, as evidence of the facts in the certificate stated, and of the results of the test; provided, that the person taking or causing to be taken the specimen and the person performing the test of such specimen shall be available, if subpoenaed as witnesses, upon demand by either party to the cause, or, when unable to appear as witnesses, shall submit a deposition upon demand by either party to the cause.

The person tested is entitled to have an additional sample of blood or urine procured and the resulting test performed by any medical laboratory of the person's own choosing and at the person's own expense; provided, that the medical laboratory is licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 29.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to operate any vessel subject to registration or any commercial vessel as defined in this section on the public waters of the state while such person's privilege to do so is suspended.

This section does not apply to any vessel that is moored or anchored.

Acts 1989, ch. 92, § 5; 1990, ch. 981, § 1; 1995, ch. 355, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. §69-10-217; Acts 2005, ch. 90, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 529, § 1; 2007, ch. 185, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former §69-9-217 was transferred to §69-9-219 in 1989.

Cross-References. Arrest without warrant, §69-9-220.

Penalties for violation of this section, §§40-35-111,69-9-219.

Attorney General Opinions. Personal immunity of emergency medical technicians and paramedics from tort suits, OAG 03-093, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (7/28/03).

69-9-218. Jet boats that carry passengers for hire.

Jet boats that carry passengers for hire shall:

Only operate during the hours between ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and five o'clock p.m. (5:00 p.m.) on Monday through Friday;

Only operate during the hours between ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.) on Saturday and Sunday;

Not travel at a speed greater than a no-wake speed within fifty feet (50') of any private or public dock or boat ramp;

Not travel at any time at a speed greater than thirty-three nautical miles per hour (33 NMPH);

Be subject to the noise level restrictions under part 3 of this chapter; and

Not perform the maneuver commonly called a “donut” within one-hundred feet (100') of any private vessel or the shoreline.

Beginning July 1, 2018, no person shall locate any outfitter or other business that carries passengers for hire on jet boats within five thousand feet (5,000') of another outfitter or other business that carries passengers for hire on jet boats.

A person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor and, upon conviction of an offense, shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

This section shall only apply in a tourist resort county, as defined in § 42-1-301.

Acts 2018, ch. 830, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-9-219. Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, except § 69-9-216(a) or § 69-9-217, including any rules and regulations adopted by the commission, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Any person who violates § 69-9-216(a) commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person violating § 69-9-217(a) commits a Class A misdemeanor and, upon conviction for the first offense, shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and in the discretion of the court, shall be confined in the county jail or workhouse for a period not to exceed eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days. In the discretion of the court, in addition to a fine or a jail sentence, or both, the person's privilege to operate any vessel subject to registration on the public waters of the state shall be suspended for a period not to exceed one (1) year.

For conviction of the second offense, there shall be imposed a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and in the discretion of the court, the person shall be confined in the county jail or workhouse for a period not to exceed eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days, and the court shall prohibit such convicted person from operating any vessel subject to registration on the public waters of the state for a period of two (2) years.

For the third or subsequent conviction, there shall be imposed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and the person shall be confined in the county jail or workhouse for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days, and the court shall prohibit such convicted person or persons from operating any vessel subject to registration on the public waters of the state for a period of not less than three (3) years nor more than ten (10) years.

The court, in its discretion, may require a person convicted of a violation of § 69-9-217(a) to remove litter from public areas, playgrounds, picnic ramps and areas giving the public access to the public waters of the state or to work in a recycling center or other appropriate location for any prescribed period of time in addition to any of the penalties otherwise provided in this section. Any person sentenced to remove litter under the circumstances set out in this subdivision (c)(2) shall be allowed to do so at a time other than that person's regular hours of employment.

For purposes of this section, a person whose convictions for violating § 69-9-217(a) occur more than ten (10) years apart is not considered a multiple offender and the penalties imposed upon multiple offenders by subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) do not apply to such person.

No person charged with a violation of § 69-9-217(a) shall be eligible for suspension of prosecution and dismissal of charges pursuant to §§ 40-15-102 — 40-15-105 and 40-32-101(a)(3)-(c)(3), or for any other pretrial diversion program, nor shall any person convicted under § 69-9-217(a) be eligible for suspension of sentence or probation pursuant to title 40, chapter 35, part 3, or any other law authorizing suspension of sentence or probation, until such time as the person has fully served day for day at least the minimum sentence provided by law.

All persons sentenced under subdivision (c)(1) or (c)(2) shall be required to serve the difference between the time actually served and the maximum sentence on probation. The judge, in the judge's discretion, may impose any conditions of probation that are reasonably related to the offense but shall impose the following conditions:

Participation in an alcohol safety boating under the influence (BUI) school program, if available;

Upon the second or subsequent conviction for violating § 69-9-217(a), participation in a program of rehabilitation at an alcohol treatment facility, if available; and

The payment of restitution to any person suffering physical injury or personal losses as the result of such offense, if such person is economically capable of making such restitution.

Any person convicted under § 69-9-217(a) of an initial or subsequent offense shall be advised in writing of the penalty for second and subsequent convictions, and, in addition, when pronouncing sentence, the judge shall advise the defendant of the penalties for additional offenses.

In the prosecution of second or subsequent offenders, the indictment or charging instrument must allege the prior convictions for violating any of the provisions of § 69-9-217(a), setting forth the time and place of each prior conviction or convictions.

In addition to all other fines, fees, costs and punishments now prescribed by law, in any county having a county operated blood alcohol concentration testing facility, a blood alcohol concentration (BAC) test fee in the amount of seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50) will be assessed upon conviction of an offense of operating a vessel subject to registration for each offender who has taken a breath-alcohol test on an evidential breath testing unit provided, maintained and administered by a law enforcement agency in the counties or where breath, blood or urine has been analyzed by a publicly funded forensic laboratory. This fee shall be collected by the clerks of various courts of the counties and forwarded to the county trustee on a monthly basis, and designated for exclusive use by the law enforcement testing unit of the counties if the BAC test was conducted on an evidential breath testing unit. If the blood alcohol test was conducted by a publicly funded forensic laboratory, the fee shall be collected by the clerks of the various courts of the counties and forwarded to the county trustee on a monthly basis and designated for exclusive use by the publicly funded forensic laboratory.

No person arrested under this subsection (c) shall be subject to strip searches or body cavity searches, or both, unless the arresting officer has probable cause to believe the arrested person may be concealing a weapon or contraband, or both, in such person's body cavity. “Contraband” includes, but is not limited to, illegal drugs.

In addition to all other fines, fees, costs, and punishments now prescribed by law, an ignition interlock fee of forty dollars ($40.00) shall be assessed for each violation of § 69-9-217, occurring on or after July 1, 2018, and resulting in a conviction for such offense. All proceeds collected pursuant to this subdivision (c)(9) shall be transmitted to the treasurer for deposit in the electronic monitoring indigency fund pursuant to § 55-10-419(g).

Any person violating § 69-9-217(m) commits a Class B misdemeanor and, upon conviction of the violation, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or shall be confined in the county jail or workhouse for no more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 21; 1967, ch. 153, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 70-2221,69-10-217; Acts 1989, ch. 92, §§ 7-9; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 981, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-219; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 13; 2018, ch. 1046, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§69-10-219 (now §69-9-219) was transferred to §69-10-221 (now §69-9-221) in 1989.

Acts 2018, ch. 1046, § 12 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A, B and C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

69-9-220. Authority of enforcement officers — Arrest — Inspections — Warning citations — Emergency vessels.

Every wildlife officer and any additional enforcement officers who may be specified by the executive director have the authority to enforce this chapter and, in the exercise of the authority, have the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to this chapter. They may arrest on sight, without warrant, any person detected by them in the act of violating any of the provisions of this chapter. The officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person at the scene of a boating accident who is the operator of a vessel involved in such accident when, based on personal investigation, the officer has probable cause to believe that such person has violated either § 69-9-216(a), relative to reckless or negligent endangerment or § 69-9-217(a), relative to boating under the influence. They have the same right as sheriffs to require aid in arresting, with or without process, any person found by them violating any of the provisions of this chapter.

No person shall resist, hinder, obstruct, or abuse any law enforcement officer while the officer is attempting to arrest offenders of this chapter or while the officer is making necessary inspections to determine that there is compliance with this chapter.

The commission is authorized to provide by duly promulgated regulation a system for issuing warning citations under such conditions as may be deemed proper.

This section does not authorize officers to inspect vessels for any purpose other than to determine if the vessels meet the registration and safety requirements of this chapter.

Vessels operated by persons commissioned as law enforcement officers as provided in subsection (a), shall be designated as emergency vessels and both the vessel and the law enforcement officer are exempt from normal operating requirements when the vessel is being used for law enforcement purposes.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 22; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 19, 20; T.C.A., §§ 70-2222,69-10-218; Acts 1989, ch. 92, § 10; 1992, ch. 601, § 3; 2000, ch. 830, § 3; T.C.A. §69-10-220.

Compiler's Notes. Former §69-10-220 (now §69-9-220) was transferred to §69-10-222 (now §69-9-222) in 1989.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of TWRA Officers to Enforce Local Noise Ordinances on Waters by Agreement with Local Law Enforcement Agency. OAG 15-68, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (9/23/15).

69-9-221. [Reserved.]

On or before the fifteenth day of each month, magistrates or clerks of general sessions courts and other courts shall make a detailed report of all fines and forfeitures collected during the previous calendar month, this report to be made on forms provided by the commission, and the magistrates or clerks of general sessions courts shall retain ten percent (10%) of fines and forfeitures collected or taken, and shall pay one half (½) of the balance to the state treasurer with the report, to be placed to the credit of the wildlife resources fund, and shall pay one half (½) of the balance to the trustee of the county in which the fine or forfeiture was collected, to be placed to the credit of the general funds of the county.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 16; 1975, ch. 87, § 8; 1975, ch. 184, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., §§ 70-2224,69-10-220; T.C.A. §69-10-222.

69-9-223. [Reserved.]

The executive director, or the executive director's designees or officers, upon observing a boat being used without sufficient lifesaving or firefighting devices, or in an overloaded or other unsafe condition, which in such person's judgment creates an especially hazardous condition, may direct the operator to take whatever immediate and reasonable steps would be necessary for the safety of those aboard the vessel, including directing the operator to return to mooring and to remain there until the situation creating the hazard is corrected or ended.

Acts 1989, ch. 92, § 11; T.C.A. §69-10-224.

69-9-225. Personal flotation devices required for persons twelve (12) years of age and under — Penalty.

All persons twelve (12) years of age and under in an open boat or on an open deck of a vessel being used for recreational purposes on the waters of this state shall wear a United States coast guard approved wearable personal flotation device while such vessel is underway. Any personal flotation devices required by this section shall be in good and serviceable condition, appropriately sized and properly worn by the person. It is unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in violation of this section.

This section does not apply to a commercial vessel owned and operated by a commercial entity that charges a per passenger fee.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Any person cited under this section shall be given thirty (30) days to provide to the officer proof of legal age and for good cause shown, in the judgment of the officer, such period shall be extended for an additional period of thirty (30) days. In the event the proof shows that the person was of legal age at the time of arrest, the individual shall not be required to appear in court and the court, upon request of the officer, shall dismiss the citation and there shall be no costs assessed to the person.

Acts 1997, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. §69-10-225.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-9-226. Operation of vessel by persons born after January 1, 1989 — Exceptions — Boating safety course certificates — Orientation — Violations.

Except as provided in subsection (b), it is unlawful for any person born after January 1, 1989, to operate any vessel subject to registration on any waters of this state unless the operator:

Has successfully completed a monitored National Association of State Boating Law Administrators (NASBLA) approved boating safety examination administered by the agency or an approved representative of the agency; and

Has received a certificate from the Tennessee wildlife resources agency as evidence of successful completion of a monitored NASBLA-approved boating safety examination administered by the agency or an approved representative of the agency; or

Is accompanied on the vessel by, and is under the direct supervision of a person who:

Is eighteen (18) years of age or older and is certified as provided in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2); or

Was born on or before January 1, 1989.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to:

Nonresidents of Tennessee. Nonresidents of Tennessee shall show proof of successful completion of an approved NASBLA course;

Vessels powered by engines of eight and one-half (8.5) horsepower or less;

Persons with operator licenses issued by the United States coast guard; or

Operators of sailboats when under sail alone.

Certificates of completion of boating safety courses required by this section:

Must be in the possession of the boat operator while such boat is in operation;

Shall contain a physical description of the boat operator, including, but not limited to, the operator's address, date of birth, and a unique tracking number;

Shall not expire, but may be revoked by action of an applicable court; and

Shall be issued for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00). Replacement cards shall be issued for a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

Except as permitted under subdivision (d)(4), a marina, livery, or other rental operation shall not hire, lease, or rent a motorboat to any renter without first providing the renter with an orientation pertinent to the motorboat type being hired, leased, or rented. Any orientation provided under this subdivision (d)(1) must be approved by the agency and include at least the following information:

Basic operation of the motorboat, including steering capability when the power is decreased or at idle;

Required safety equipment;

Rules for the operation of vessels on the waters of this state;

The meaning of the state uniform waterway marking system buoys; and

Any laws or agency rules specific to the particular motorboat type.

A renter must acknowledge in writing that the renter has received the orientation required by subdivision (d)(1) before the marina, livery, or other rental operation may allow the renter to operate the motorboat on the waters of this state.

A marina, livery, or other rental operation shall maintain any written acknowledgement executed by a renter from the marina, livery, or other rental operation under subdivision (b)(2) for a period of time to be established by rule of the agency, but not less than thirty (30) days. A written acknowledgement must be available for inspection by the agency during regular business hours.

A marina, livery, or other rental operation is not required to provide orientation to a renter who:

Has successfully completed a monitored NASBLA-approved boating safety examination as described in subdivision (a)(1) and received a certificate from the agency as described in subdivision (a)(2);

Is a nonresident of this state who shows proof of successful completion of an approved NASBLA course;

Has been issued an operator license by the United States coast guard; or

Was born on or before January 1, 1989.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor punished by a fine only and, in addition to the fine, a court may revoke a certificate of completion of a boat safety course. It is unlawful for an owner or person directly in charge of a vessel subject to registration to authorize or permit knowingly such vessel to be operated on the waters of this state in violation of this section.

Acts 2003, ch. 260, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-226; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 14; 2018, ch. 969, §§ 2, 3; 2019, ch. 267, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (d) and redesignated former (d) as present (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 267, § 2. April 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-9-227. Regulation of commercial operations that lease or rent nonmotorized vessels for noncommercial use.

As used in this section:

“Nonmotorized vessels” means canoes, kayaks, stand-up paddle boards, tubes, and any other vessels powered only by their occupants and propelled by manual methods, including, but not limited to paddles and oars; and

“Waters of Tennessee” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state, except privately owned ponds or lakes not used for commercial purposes.

The commission is hereby authorized to establish rules, regulations, permits, and procedures regulating all aspects of commercial operations that lease or rent nonmotorized vessels for noncommercial use by the public on the waters of Tennessee.

The regulatory authority granted under subdivision (b)(1) does not:

Apply to commercial operations permitted by either the department of environment and conservation pursuant to title 11, chapter 8, or the United States forest service; or

Preclude the department of environment and conservation from issuing permits, licenses, or leases for commercial activities occurring within its jurisdiction.

In maintaining information on the number and type of non-motorized vessels leased each day, the information shall be submitted under seal only for the use of the commission and the agency, and may only be used in the aggregate in agency reports and records.

Each outfitter shall submit a regular report from the agency required records on May 1, October 1, and December 1, each year, and the report shall cover activity since the previous report.

The commission may only assess a fee on a commercial outfitter by rule, and no such rule may take effect before July 1, 2021.

The commission may consider the implementation of a multiple year permit system in consideration of the business history of long-term commercial outfitters.

To insure that the views of the commercial paddle craft outfitter community are appropriately communicated as well as to assist the fish and wildlife commission in developing rules and regulations on commercial outfitting, there is created a commercial paddle craft advisory committee. The committee members shall be named by the wildlife resources executive director and shall include, but not be limited to, a majority of commercial paddle craft outfitters and other interested stakeholders. The committee shall also strive to develop non-regulatory strategies to address issues and to facilitate access for all users. The members of the committee shall serve as volunteers and shall not be paid or reimbursed for time served as committee members.

Acts 2018, ch. 969, § 1; 2019, ch. 347, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b)(2), which read: “The regulatory authority granted under subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply to commercial outfitters operating pursuant to and in possession of a permit issued by the United States forest service on waters in and adjacent to the Cherokee National Forest.”; and added (c)–(f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 347, § 3. July 1, 2019.

69-9-228. Yielding right-of-way to emergency vessel making use of flashing lights.

Upon the approach of an authorized emergency vessel making use of flashing lights, the operator of every other vessel shall yield the right-of-way and shall slow to a no wake speed or immediately move over at least one hundred feet (100') to a position of safety from the emergency vessels, clear of any other vessel, until the authorized emergency vessel has passed, except when otherwise directed by operators of emergency vessels.

Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency vessel, when the vessel is giving a signal by use of flashing lights, a person operating an approaching vessel shall, while proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by slowing to a no wake speed or moving over at least one hundred feet (100') to a position of safety from the emergency vessels, clear of any other motorized vessel, if possible, with due regard to safety and boat traffic conditions.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding § 8-21-401, the court costs imposed or assessed against any person convicted of a violation of this section may not exceed the maximum fine amount that may be imposed for a violation of this section.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed as precluding a person who violates this section from being prosecuted and convicted under any other applicable offense.

This section shall not operate to relieve the operator of an authorized emergency vessel, from the duty to operate the vessel with due regard for the safety of all persons located in the vicinity of such vessels on the waters of Tennessee.

Acts 2018, ch. 969, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.